<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88708-0012 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.7-08-88.f2.A1011</DOCID><TEXT>  <FTAG tagnum="4702"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 131 / Friday, July 8, 1988 / ProposedRules<ITAG tagnum="1">Vol. 53, No. 131</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="2">Friday, July 8, 1988</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="94"><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">14 CFR Parts 221 and 389</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 43343; Notice 88-10]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">RIN 2105-ABOO</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Electronic Filing of Tariffs</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary; Department of Transportation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Notice of proposed rulemaking.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>In response to a petition for emergency rulemaking filedby the Airline Tariff Publishing Company, the Department is proposing toamend its regulations to allow carriers to file passenger fares tariffselectronically. This proposal is being made because it is becoming increasinglyevident that some form of interim relief from the burdens associated withthe paper tariff filing system is necessary in the near-term, even whilethe Department continues the development of a completely automated tarifffiling system.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>Comments must be received no later than September 6, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESS: </T2>Five (5) copies of any comments should be sent to theDocumentary Services Division, C-55, U.S. Department of Transportation,400-7th Street SW., Washington, DC 20590. Comments should refer to Docket43343. Persons wishing acknowledgment of their comments should includea stamped, self-addressed postcard with their comments. The Docket Clerkwill time- and date-stamp the card and return it to the commenter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Thomas G. Moore, Chief, TariffsDivision, P-44, Department of Transportation, 400-7th Street SW., Washington,DC 20590. Telephone: (202) 366-2414.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Section 403 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958, as amended (Act), requiresall U.S. and foreign air carriers to file tariffs with the Department ofTransportation (the ``Department'' or ``DOT'') setting forth passengerfares, cargo rates, other charges, and rules which apply to air transportationbetween a point or points in the United States, its territories or possessions,on the one hand, and foreign points, on the other. Once approved by therespective government aviation authorities, as required under bilateralagreements and/or the Act, these tariffs become legally binding contractsof carriage for international air transportation.The airlines currently file tariffs on paper in accordance with the requirementsfound in 14 CFR Part 221 of the Department's regulations. These requirementshave remained essentially the same since their inception in 1938, whenthe former Civil Aeronautics Board (the ``Board'') was established. Now,half a century later, carriers and their tariff publishing agents are stillsubmitting all proposed fares, rates, and rules on paper, and DOT analystsare still searching through voluminous paper documents to evaluate allproposed tariffs.This paper system worked well in a regulatory environment when tariffswere more stable and static. However, the aviation environment has changeddramatically in the last ten years. U.S. domestic air transportation hasbeen completely deregulated and the international aviation marketplacehas become increasingly more competitive. Carrier fares, rules, and ratesare now subject to frequent, sometimes daily, changes. As a result, thevolume of tariff pages filed has increased tremendously, creating a burdenon the Department, the industry, and the public that has become virtuallyunmanageable and unworkable. We expect the tariff volume to continue toincrease substantially in future years. In this connection, we note thatin 1985 the Department had over 20,000 tariff pages, containing more thanone million fares, rates, and rules, in effect and on file on any givenday; today, the number of currently effective tariff pages on file exceeds40,000.Our ability to handle this growing volume of tariff filings has been severelytaxed. In the future, it could become extremely difficult for the Departmentto fulfill its statutory and regulatory responsibilities unless major modificationsare made in the current paper-based tariff filing system. We have takensteps to handle the ever increasing volume of tariff filings.<ITAG tagnum="84">Steps Already Taken</ITAG>The Department has already demonstrated its concern over the increasingburdens that the filing and processing of paper tariffs places on all involved.On August 19, 1985, we issued an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking(ANPRM) (50 FR 33452) indicating that the Department was considering establishingan automated tariff system, one that would allow carriers to file and disseminatetariff information electronically. The ANPRM included information regardingthe current tariff system, as well as a preliminary outline for a proposedcomputerized system, and it requested comment on the feasibility and advisabilityof such a proposal.Seventeen commenters responded to the ANPRM. (See Docket 43343). The ANPRMreceived strong and nearly universal support. The supporting commenterspresented some specific suggestions on how we should implement tariff automation,and also raised a number of concerns that could arise depending on theapproach we might adopt. We have taken these comments into account in formulatingthe present interim proposal. (We have summarized and addressed the commentsto the ANPRM in the section below labeled ``Supplementary Discussion ofComments on the ANPRM''.) The only opposition to the ANPRM came from acarrier concerned that the costs of electronic filing would be burdensome.In response to this concern, we are proposing that electronic filing underthis rule would not be mandatory but, rather, an alternative to paper filing.Several of the commenters suggested that we allow the industry and otherprivate sector interests to participate in the design and development ofany system. Accordingly, in November 1986, the Department established anAdvisory Committee to assist the Department in the development of its proposedElectronic Tariff System (ETS) (51 FR 42327, Novemer 24, 1986). The Committeeis made up of representatives of a variety of interests, including U.S.air carriers, foreign air carriers, tariff publishing agents, airline associations,the information industry, and consumer groups. The Committee met on twooccasions during the first half of 1987. The Committee has made two recommendationsto the Department. First, the Committee requested that the Department amendthe posting regulations for international air transportation to allow carriersand agents to provide notice of, access to, and information concerning,the terms of their contracts of carriage in a manner similar to that applicableto U.S. domestic air transportation. This request is under Department review.The Advisory Committee also recommended that the Department conduct experimentsto determine if there were any existing systems/ databases available whichcould serve as a foundation for the future ETS, or any methods of electronicallytransmitting Special Tariff Permission Applications (STPAs) that wouldease the Department's processing of these applications. A carrier mustfile an STPA whenever it wishes to file a tariff on less than the requiredstatutory/bilateral notice. The current STPA procedure is a two step process.The carrier must first submit a detailed description of the changes itwishes to implement with and explanation and, when necessary, economicjustification. If the Department grants the STPA and the carrier choosesto implement the authorized changes, the carrier must then print a tariffand file it with the Department. Approximately 95-98 percent of all tarifffilings are filed pursuant to an approved STPA. In July 1987, we publishednotices in the<T4> Federal Register</T4> and the<T3> Commerce Business Daily</T3> requesting that interested parties submittheir expressions of interest to the Department. (52 FR 27099, 27100, July17, 1987;<T3> Commerce Business Daily</T3>, Issue No. PSA-9391, July 29, 1987.)The Department is currently reviewing these submissions. <ITAG tagnum="84">The Need for Interim Relief </ITAG>Against the background of these developments, it is apparent that the currentpaper filing regime is antiquated, inefficient and costly, and needs tobe replaced with a modern, efficient and cost effective alternative. Webelieve that some form of automation is a logical alternative. Department staff, along with our Transportation System Center (TSC) andits on-site contractor, have been working to develop the prerequisitesof an electronic tariff system. TSC has prepared a<T3> Preliminary Electronic Tariff ADP Requirements Study</T3> and a<T3> Draft Staff Study Electronic Tariff System Data Model</T3>. (Copiesof these documents are included in Docket 43343.) These two documents set out many of the functions and data elements, andthe basic structure of an ETS. They have provided an excellent launchingof our automation effort. As that effort has progressed, however, it hasbecome clear that the automation project is one of major scope that raisesa number of complex issues. We are actively moving forward to resolve the issues related to this effort.However, we recognize that a serious need exists to provide at least somedegree of interim relief from the burdens of filing and processing papertariffs, and that this relief is needed now, even while our longer-termautomation efforts continue. We believe that a rule along the lines ofthat being proposed here and discussed below would provide both the industryand the Department some near-term relief. We recognize that the rule we are now proposing would provide only a portionof the benefits which would accrue to the Department, the industry, andthe public once the efficiencies of a fully automated tariff system areachieved. However, in view of the situation in which we and the industryfind ourselves today, we tentatively conclude that some relief is plainlybetter than no relief at all. We also recognize that, upon completion ofthe definition and design of a fully automated tariff filing system, thisproposed rule may not be a part of any final rule issued pursuant to ouroutstanding ANPRM on electronic tariff filing. However, we believe thatany experience we might gain while operating under this proposal wouldbe invaluable in our development of that system. We emphasize that we are not departing from our ultimate goal of establishinga fully integrated electronic tariff system,<T3> i.e.</T3>, one where data would be held in one official central database(whether inside or outside Departmental headquarters), and where softwarewould be developed to perform, or facilitate the performance of, variousprocedures which constitute the functions of the Department (essentiallyanalysis of tariff filings for conformity to statutory and regulatory requirements).Our simple objective here is to provide some measure of interim reliefto the Department and the industry from the burdens of filing paper tariffs.<ITAG tagnum="84">ATPCO Petition </ITAG>On December 16, 1987, Airline Tariff Publishing Company (ATPCO) petitionedthe Department for emergency rulemaking to amend 14 CFR Part 221 to allowcarriers to file passenger fares tariffs electronically as an alternativeto the current paper requirements. ATPCO is the industry's major tarifffiling agent, publishing tariffs on behalf of over 90 percent of all carriersrequired to file tariffs with the Department. Included with ATPCO's petitionwas a proposal, including proposed rule language, which it believes wouldprovide immediate relief to the industry and at the same time facilitatethe Department's tariff processing resposibilities until such time as theDepartment is able to complete development of an automated tariff system.In support of its petition and proposal, ATPCO states that the currentinternational aviation environment, with its constantly changing pricestructures, and the need for rapid processing of the paper tariffs associatedwith implementing such changes, has made it extremely difficult for ATPCOto be responsive to the carriers for which it files tariffs, and that someimmediate relief is needed. It further states that the industry is currentlyspending at least $5,000,000 per year to produce, file, and distributepaper tariff documents; that the ability of its carriers effectively tocompete in this environment is diminished by the time lags inherent inproducing and processing paper tariffs; that the current situation alsoimpacts negatively on the public's ability to avail itself of the benefitsof increased competition; that implementation of an electronic filing systemas soon as possible would allow the Department to take advantage of theefficiencies currently available to the airline industry by virtue of itsaccess to a highly developed automated system; that an amendment to Part221, which would permit tariffs to be filed, reviewed and stored electronically,would be consistent with, and could be a part of, the Department's on-goingrulemaking for electronic tariffs; and finally, that because ATPCO is willingto create a fares database for the Department at no charge, an electronicfares filing system could be implemented with a minimal expenditure ofgovernment funds.In general, ATPCO's proposal provides that any carrier or tariff filingagent would be able to file tariffs electronically if it establishes andmaintains, on behalf of DOT, a database of all tariffs filed electronicallyby such carrier or agent. The Department would have unlimited access tothis data at no charge, as well as the ability to input certain informationinto the database. This would include, but not necessarily be limited to,such information as the approval, rejection, or suspension of any proposedfare change; or the grant or denial of an STPA application. The ATPCO proposalalso provides that the filing carrier or agent would provide public accessto this information to the extent deemed necessary by the Department. Also,the carrier or agent would maintain tariff data on-line for a period oftwo (2) years.<ITAG tagnum="84">Answers to ATPCO's Petition</ITAG>Six parties have filed answers in support of the ATPCO petition: USAirGroup, Inc. (USAir Group), Air Transport Association of America (ATA),American Airlines, Pan American World Airways, Lufthansa German Airlines,and Japan Air Lines.The answers state that the inefficiencies of the paper tariff system hurtthe airline industry's ability to compete in an increasingly competitiveenvironment; that ATPCO and the industry have developed sophisticated electronicsystems for handling airline fares; and that the Department should takeadvantage of those capabilities to enhance the efficiency of its tariffsystem.The International Foundation of Airline Passenger Associations (IFAPA)also filed an answer in response to ATPCO's petition. IFAPA states thatit has no difficulty with the overall objective behind the ATPCO proposal.However, it voices concern with the issue of public access, the chargesto be made for such access, and the format of the information to be madeavailable. It asks that, if we proceed to rulemaking, we include provisionsthat respond to these issues. It further asks that we not proceed by emergencyrulemaking procedures, so that we can give these issues careful attention.The only answer in opposition to ATPCO's petition came from ABC International(ABC). ABC is a British company specializing in tariff collection and informationdistribution to the travel industry. Its publications include, among others,the <T3>ABC World Airways Guide </T3>and the <T3>Air Cargo Guide. </T3>ABC urges the Department to deny ATPCO's petitionfor substantive and procedural reasons. Specifically, ABC alleges that,under the ATPCO proposal, individual carriers, or their agents, will ownand control the database; therefore, because ATPCO is owned by most majorU.S. and some foreign carriers, the potential for bias in favor of itscarrier owners may render ATPCO an unsuitable entity to control all ora significant part of the ETS database; that under ATPCO's proposal, ABCand other interested parties may not be able to gain on-line access tothe ATPCO database, or <T3>vice versa; </T3>that implementing the ATPCO proposal would raise competitiveissues in light of ATPCO's large market share; that issuance of an emergencyrule is an improper manner for the Department to proceed, one which couldgive ``short shrift'' to the work being done in connection with the Department'son-going rulemaking in this Docket; and that the Department must take certainlegal steps, especially in the procurement area, before implementing anelectronic tariff.ATPCO filed a response to ABC's answer stating that ABC misunderstood theunderlying premise of ATPCO's proposal, which neither contemplates norrequires procurement action; that ATPCO's proposal in no way favors ATPCOover any other filing agent; that both the public and DOT will have accessto the Department's official tariff database, at Departmental headquarters,as soon as fares are submitted, and that others who would like to accessATPCO's (or any other filing agent's) database can still do so by purchasingaccess such as is done now; and that free unrestricted on-line access tothe Department's official tariff database is not necessary to satisfy theDepartment's public obligations.ABC International filed a rejoinder to ATPCO's response, which essentiallyexpands upon points previously raised.<ITAG tagnum="84">Disposition Of Petition</ITAG>After consideration of the comments received, we have decided to grantthe ATPCO petition in part and deny it in part.We agree that a rule along the lines of that proposed by ATPCO could providesubstantial public benefits and would be particularly useful at the presenttime in light of our need to gain interim relief. We will not, however,issue an emergency interim final rule as proposed by ATPCO. While we arecertainly sympathetic to ATPCO's need (as well as our own) for relief fromthe burden of paper tariffs, we find that no such an emergency exists thatwould cause us to bypass our normal rulemaking procedures.Although ATPCO indicates that its current goal is the electronic filingof passenger fares, the ATPCO petition is worded sufficiently broadly toencompass the electronic filing of the entire tariff. We are not preparedat this time to permit the electronic filing of any data other than passengerfares, including arbitraries, footnotes, routings, fare class explanations,etc., and related STPA's. Therefore, we will not grant the ATPCO petitionto the extent that it would permit the filing of electronic tariffs forother than passenger fares.<ITAG tagnum="85">The Controlling Setting for our Proposal: the Department's TariffResponsibilities</ITAG>Any electronic filing system, interim or otherwise, must enable us to continueto perform all of our ongoing tariff functions. Clearly then, an appreciationof these functions is critical to an understanding of the provisions ofour proposal. So, before turning to a description of our proposal, we beginby reviewing our tariff responsibilities.The Department of Transportation is charged with the responsibility forreviewing proposed tariffs to ensure that they comply with U.S. laws andinternational agreements. The Department must approve or disapprove allU.S. and foreign carrier tariff proposals. In connection with its tariffresponsibilities, the Department receives, reviews, approves or disapproves,and maintains a file of all international tariff filings, STPAs, and waivers.(A waiver is filed whenever a carrier, or its agent, wishes to deviatefrom the tariff filing requirements of 14 CFR Part 221.) In addition, theDepartment must certify tariff documents for use in court cases and otherpurposes.The following tasks are involved in performing our statutory and regulatoryresponsibilities with respect to tariffs: (For a more in-depth discussionof our tariff responsibilities, see the <T3>Preliminary Electronic Tariff ADP Requirements Study, </T3>at pp. 2-4thru 2-19.)andbullet; The Department receives, tracks, and stores tariff documents asspecified by the governing regulations. andbullet; The Department accepts, rejects or suspends tariff filings, andgrants or denies STPA's by:<ITAG tagnum="15">_Reviewing the tariff for adherence to regulations and policies; and</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Analyzing the tariff for adherence to relevant U.S. laws and internationalagreements.</ITAG>andbullet; The Department informs carriers, and/or their agents, about thestatus of tariff filings and STPA's. andbullet; The Department maintains public records for open access to publishedtariffs and to tariff filings. andbullet; The Department maintains reference data files which are used foranalyzing tariff filings and STPA's. andbullet; The Department provides certified copies of carrier tariffs foruse in legal proceedings. andbullet; The Department responds to <T3>ad hoc </T3>requests from other government bodies, including U.S. ExecutiveAgencies and other U.S. Federal Agencies, the U.S. Congress, and from localand state governments, for data analysis related to international air fares,rates and rules. As we said above, any proposal to amend the current tariff filing proceduresmust ensure that the Department can fulfill its statutory and regulatoryresponsibilities, especially our responsibility for assuring the integrityand accuracy of current and historical tariff data. We believe that ourproposal, described below, would meet this test. Moreover, it would provideneeded relief to the industry and to the Department by eliminating muchof the paperwork now required in filing passenger fares tariffs with theDepartment.<ITAG tagnum="84">Description of the Department's Proposed Rule </ITAG>We are proposing to allow any carrier, or its tariff filing agent (the``filer''), to file its passenger fares electronically by establishingand maintaining a database of all of such fares, subject to certain conditionsimposed by the Department. The Department and the public would have unlimitedaccess to this data at Departmental headquarters, and at no charge. TheDepartment would record its decisions regarding these fare filings intothis database. All daily data transactions would be recorded on an electronic storagedevice at Departmental headquarters. All Departmental actions would alsoappear in an ``on-line tariff database'' maintained by the filer.\1\<NOTE/> At the end of each day, each filer would submit to the Departmentan electronic copy of all transactions made during that day for comparisonwith the daily data transaction record.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The term ``on-line tariff database'' means the remotelyaccessible, on-line version, maintained by the filer, of (1) the electronicallyfiled tariff data submitted to the ``official DOT tariff database,'' and(2) the Departmental approvals, disapprovals, and other actions, as wellas any Departmental notation concerning such approvals, disapprovals orother actions, that Subpart W of the proposed Part 221 requires the filerto maintain in its database. The term ``official DOT tariff database''means those data records (as set forth in andSection; 221.283 and 221.286of our proposed rule) which would be in the custody of, and maintainedby, the Department of Transportation. Electronic filing would be strictly optional. The paper system would remainavailable to those carriers or filing agents perferring the <T3>status quo.</T3> We now address the mechanics of how our proposal would work. First, weenvision that the Department would be required to complete the installationof a local area network, which would be connected to several personal computersin the Department's offices. Filers desiring to file tariffs and STPA'selectronically would be required to install whatever hardware, software,and communications devices would be needed to comply with the provisionsof the rule. Whenever the term ``tariff'' is used in this proposed ruleit includes, unless the context otherwise requires, the STPA proceduresas well.Any fare changes that are to be incorporated into a tariff filing wouldbe consolidated by the filer under a ``Filing Advice Number.'' The filerwould electronically enter a text justification for the filing into thesystem, and this justification and the fare changes would be transmittedto a ``Government Filing File.'' Once a fare is entered into the ``GovernmentFiling File'' DOT would be able to enter control data and approval/disapprovalindicators which could apply to the entire filing or to specific recordswithin the filing. Submissions to the ``Government Filing File'' wouldbe allowed at any time. When an electronic submission is made to the Department, the filing advicenumber would also be included in a ``Filing Advice Status File.'' The FilingAdvice Status File'' would be updated automatically as a result of actiontaken by DOT in the ``Government Filing File.'' The file could be accessedby reference to filing date, by geographic area, by filing advice numberand by carrier. Access to this information would be made available to thepublic at Departmental headquarters. After DOT acts on any filer's proposal contained in the ``Government FilingFile'', the filer would then incorporate the proposal, including any adverseaction by DOT on any particular record, into a ``Historical File''. The``Historical File'' would contain all fares, including inactive fares.The inactive fares would be held on-line for two years after they havebecome inactive. At the expiration of this two-year period, we would requirethe filing carrier, or its agent, to provide the Department, free of charge,all such inactive data transactions on machine-readable tape or any othermutually acceptable electronic medium. The Department would store and maintain these historical/inactive datarecords for an additional three years. This would effectively satisfy DOT'sretention requirement of storing and maintaining historical/inactive datafor the required five-year period. We are proposing to liberalize our procedures so as to permit the electronicsubmission of Special Tariff Permission Applications (STPAs). We wouldpropose that when an STPA contains only electronic submissions, a filingadvice number would be used, and the STPA would be required to comply withproposed andSection; 221.302. STPA's that contain both electronic materialand related paper tariff material would have to comply with Subpart P of14 CFR Part 221. That is, these STPA's would have to bear a sequentialSTPA number, as is the case today, and this number would also have to bereflected in the electronic submission to the Department. Under this liberalizedelectronic STPA procedure, a filer would only be required to submit theproposed changes once. For all practical purposes the STPA would be treatedthe same as a tariff filing that had been made on either statutory or bilateraltariff notice, as applicable. The only substantive difference would bethat if the Department granted the STPA, the filer would be required, ifit chose to implement the authorized changes, to reference the Department'saction and to comply with any condition imposed by the Department in connectionwith its approval of the STPA. We envision that the electronic submission of data from any filer's computerto DOT's computer facilities would be accomplished by the use of a leaseddedicated conditioned data circuit. (A dedicated leased conditioned datacircuit is a communication line leased from the telephone company overwhich electronic madia may be transmitted without interference and whichensures the integrity of the data being transmitted.) The Department woulddownload all daily data transactions submitted by the filer onto Departmentcomputers. Additionally, we would require that the filer furnish the Department,on a daily basis, all transactions made to the on-line tariff databaseon a machine-readable tape, or any other mutually acceptable electronicmedium. We would compare these tapes (or other medium) with the daily transactionrecord to ensure that they were complete and accurate. If they were not,we would take steps to ensure immediate corrective action. The downloadeddaily data transactions, together with the tapes (or other agreed medium)as verified against the daily transactions data would constitute the officiallyfiled tariff with the Department for that portion of the tariff filed electronically.This approach would effectively remove the basis for ABC's concern thatthe individual carrier, or its agent, would own the official DOT tariffdatabase. The official DOT tariff database would be used for certification purposes.Also, it would routinely be employed to verify the on-line tariff databaseand, as necessary, for audit purposes. We believe that these verificationprocedures, together with internal database security measures we will implementthrough a maintenance agreement, and the availability of civil and criminalpenalties for tampering with or destroying such data, will provide an adequatedegree of accuracy in the on-line tariff database. The on-line tariff database,which would thus effectively duplicate the official DOT tariff database,would be used by the Department in performing various of its functionsand access would be made available to the public at Departmental headquarters.We propose to require the filer (a) to provide the Department the capabilityto note any action taken on any tariff filed with the Department, as wellas the reasons for such action, (b) to provide a designated place (in technicalterms, a ``field'') in the ``Government Filing File'' for the signatureof the approving U.S. Government official, that ``signature'' to be achievedthrough the use of Pesonal Identification Number (PIN), (c) to make designatedplaces (again, ``fields'') available to the Department in any record filedelectronically for inclusion into the on-line tariff database, and (d)to provide a leased dedicated conditioned data circuit to the Departmentwhich is capable of operating and handling the electronic data at a sufficientrate. We would expect, at the outset, that a circuit operating at a minimumof a 9.6K baud rate should be sufficient. Further, we propose to requirethat, in the event of a failure in the primary dedicated circuit, the filershall have in place a secondary or a redundancy circuit that will handledata at a 4.8K baud rate, or greater. We also propose to require that theprimary data circuit provided to access the on-line tariff database mustbe capable of being restored within four hours after failure. We propose to require that, in the event that the electronic tariff systemis discontinued, or the source of the data is changed (<T3>i.e., </T3>a carrier chooses to have its fares tariffs filed by anagent, or <T3>vice versa, </T3>or a carrier switches from one agent to another),all tariff records developed prior to such event shall immediately be deliveredby the filer to the Department on machine-readable tapes or any other mutuallyacceptable electronic medium. Also, should a filer stop filing tariffselectronically, we would require the filer to provide the Department, immediatelyupon cessation of electronic filing, free of charge, a copy of its on-linetariff database on machine-readable tapes or any other mutually acceptableelectronic medium.In its justification for new or increased fares which are subject to theStandard Foreign Fare Level (SFFL) or the European Civil Aviation Conference(ECAC) Agreement, we proposed that a carrier, or its agent, provide certainfare comparisons as is currently the case in the paper tariff filing environment. Specifically, we would require that the carrier, or its agent, provide,as to any proposed new or increased bundled or unbundled (whichever islower) on-demand economy fare in a direct-service market, a comparisonbetween, on the one hand, that proposed fare and, on the other hand, theceiling fare allowed in that market based on either the pertinent ECACzone or SFFL.\2\<NOTE/> If, however, the carrier's proposed fare is intended to matchthat already approved for another direct-service carrier, the proponentcarrier may forego the comparison and, instead, simply identify the competitor'sfare it claims to match.  <ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\For the purpose of this rulemaking, a direct-service marketis an international market where the carrier provides service on a nonstopor single-flight-number basis, including change-of-gauge.  We propose to require that fares in direct-service markets be filed assingle factor fares. While this may vary from the current practices ofsome of the filers, <T3>i.e.</T3> those who prefer to file fares in such markets on a basefare/arbitrary basis, we feel that the single factor approach will provideboth us and the public with more useful information and, in the contextof an electronic filing system, should represent no significant changein the filer's workload.  In order to facilitate the verification and monitoring of the SFFL regulatedfares, we propose to require that all carriers use specified applicationrule numbers in conjunction with these fares. We believe the use of specifiedrule numbers would be extremely helpful to the Department in its analysisof fare tariffs and STPA's, thereby enabling the Department of approvesome fare changes more rapidly. We invite comments on whether, in an automatedenvironment, complying with this proposed requirement would pose any majorhardship on any carrier, or its agent.  There are times when one carrier adopts the fares of another carrier asits own. This can create problems should it be necessary to research historicaltariff information. In order to facilitate such research, we propose torequire that the currently effective or prospective fares of the adoptedcarrier be changed to reflect the name of the adopting carrier as of theeffective date of the adoption. Further, such provisions would be annotatedwith a notice showing the adopted carrier and the effective date of theadoption.  We would also require that, upon institution of the electronic tariff filingunder this rule, a carrier, or its agent continue to file tariffs as specifiedin Subparts A-V of 14 CFR Part 221, <T3>i.e.,</T3> on paper, for a period of 90 days, or until such time aswe shall deem paper filing no longer to be necessary to ascertain thatall tariffs filed electronically meet our needs.  Last, we re required by regulation to give each tariff filer notice ofeach action taken under assigned authority, <T3>i.e.</T3> rejection of tariff, and approval or denial of STPA and waiverapplications. We must also give notice of the right to petition for reviewof such action. <T3>See</T3> 14 CFR 385.4. In the current paper tariff environment we providethis information with each written determination. In an electronic environment,where we will not be providing written determinations for our actions underassigned authority, we must adopt a different approach. To this end, wepropose to incorporate the notice by reference through a provision in ournew rule. <T3>See</T3> the proposed andSection;221.700.  Central to our proposed rule is the provision that a carrier, or its agent,may file its international passenger fares tariffs, <T3>including</T3> those provisions relating to the application of suchfares such as arbitraries, routing, footnotes, fare class explanations,etc., but <T3>excluding</T3> narrative fare rules, in machine-readable form. Moreover,electronic filing would be an <T3>alternative</T3> to filing such tariffs in the paper format currentlyprescribed by 14 CFR Part 221.IFAPA has voiced a concern over the format of electronically filed informationas related to the public's ability to identify certain carrier fare rules.The proposed exclusion from our rule of narrative fare rules would effectivelyremove the basis of IFAPA's concern. To file electronically, a filer must agree to establish and maintain itsfilings in such form and manner as required by the Department and shallmake its on-line tariff database available to the public, at no charge,at the Department's headquarters. Further, the Department would have theright to audit the carrier, or its agent; the carrier's, or its agent'sdatabase(s); and their applications, including, but not limited to, supportfunctions, environmental security, and any accounting data recorded bythe system. Before we would permit any carrier, or its agent, to file tariffs electronically,we would require the filer to enter into a maintenance agreement with theDepartment under which the filer would, among other things, (1) agree toestablish and maintain an on-line tariff database for use by the Departmentand the public; and (2) assure the Department any oversight and right tomonitor any system (operating, environmental, and application) necessaryto our use of the database. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Access </ITAG>We propose that the filer make access to its on-line tariff database availableto the public, at DOT headquarters, at no charge, during business hours.We would require that the filer place one or more Computer Video DisplayTerminals, <T3>i.e. </T3>in technical terms, a Cathode Ray Tube, (CRT) and one ormore printers, connected to the on-line tariff database, in the TariffsPublic Reference Room. The number of CRT's and printers which would berequired for public access would be determined by the Department. Further,the filer would be responsible for the maintenance of such equipment andwould need to enter into an agreement to indemnify and hold the Departmentand the U.S. Government harmless from any claims or liabilities which mayresult from any defects in this equipment. The public would have accessto the on-line tariff database, with a query capability that would provideaccess to those elements listed in andSection;andSection; 221.283 and 221.286of our proposed rule. Certified copies of tariffs would be provided bythe Department at a reasonable charge. Regarding remote access to the on-line tariff database, a concern raisedby both ABC and IFAPA, we propose steps to ensure that tariff informationfiled electronically will be reasonably available to the public, includingpotential competitors. We have proposed in andSection; 221.600 of this noticethat any electronic filer must afford remote access to its on-line tariffdatabase to any member of the public, at a charge that does not exceeda reasonable estimate of the added cost of providing the service. Thiswould extend to electronic filings the rule currently in effect for paperfilings (14 CFR 221.179). This would not, however, preclude the offeringof machine-readable copies of the on-line tariff database or other value-addedservices by the filer at such reasonable prices as may be set by it. Commentis solicited on the extent to which the public would seek access to theon-line tariff database, especially in preference to the value-added servicesalready available. <ITAG tagnum="84">Filing fees and user fees </ITAG>By law, fees charged for filing tariffs should cover the basic costs ofprocessing the tariff material filed. In our ANPRM, we noted that filingfees for tariffs are currently assessed on a per-page basis, at a rateof $2.00 per side. There is no fee for pages reprinted without change_forexample, the reverse side of a page filed with fare or rate changes onit. We currently charge a flat rate of $12 for each STPA submitted. See14 CFR 389.25. ATPCO suggested that filing fees for the electronic transmission of tariffsshould be waived until such time as the Department establishes a fee schedule.We are not prepared to waive filing fees for those carriers that exercisethe option to file their fares electronically. This, by its very nature,would be inequitable to those carriers that continue to file their tariffsonly in the paper medium. Furthermore, filing fees are intended to coverthe actual processing time costs for ensuring technical compliance withthe Act. (<T3>See </T3>OR-204, effective January 10, 1983, Dockets 30586 and 30816;48 FR 635, January 6, 1983). Therefore, we will not grant ATPCO's requestto waive filing fees for electronic tariffs. In an automated tariff filing system, even one as limited in scope as thatproposed in our rule, we would need to adopt a different filing fee approachfrom that used in the paper system. We propose a filing fee structure providingfor the assessment of a fee on a per record basis. We propose to establishan interim filing fee of 5 cents for one or more transactions proposedin any existing record, and 5 cents for any proposed canceled or new record.For ETS purposes, we propose to define <T3>record </T3>as ``that set of information which describes one (1) tarifffare, or that set of information which describes one (1) related elementassociated with such tariff fare.'' We based our proposed interim fee on the transaction volume studies conductedin the <T3>Tariffs Computerization Project_Feasibility Study and Cost AnalysisReport </T3>(June 1985) and <T3>Preliminary Electronic Tariff ADP Requirements Study </T3>(March 1987),and on estimates derived from the existing direct labor costs we have experiencedin processing the current paper records. Both of the cited studies estimatedthat there were on average approximately 50 transactions per tariff farepage, and that virtually all these transactions were under the STPA process.Using this average of 50 transactions per tariff fare page, and factoringthe STPA filing fee into the cost for processing paper tariff pages, wearrived at a proposed filing fee that we believe is consistent with thecosts of providing these services.In assessing electronic filing fees we would not charge separately forelectronic STPAs and fare records. This is because virtually all fare filings(98%) are submitted under the STPA process. Given this fact, we believethat applying a single filing fee is the most efficient and cost effectivemethod of fee assessment. There are several areas that need to be clarified in the assessment ofthe proposed filing fees. These are: (a) what fees should be assessed duringthe 90-day implementation period under proposed andSection; 221.500, (b)what fees should be assessed after the 90-day implementation period, (c)what fees should be assessed when a filer elects to file electronically,and is also required to file paper tariffs under proposed andSection; 221.275,and (d) should foreign air carriers that have been exempted from filingfees under 14 CFR 389.24 be required to pay electronic filing fees. We propose that during the implementation period no electronic filing feewould apply; however, the filer would continue to pay the required paperfiling fee. We propose that once the filer receives authority to ceasefiling paper fares tariffs and is permitted to file electronic fares tariffs,the electronic filing fee would apply to such fares tariffs. We proposethat when a filer is authorized to file both electronic and paper tariffsunder andSection; 221.275, the filing fee, as applicable, would apply individuallyto each medium. We propose that foreign air carriers that have been exemptedunder andSection; 389.24 of our economic regulations would also be exemptfrom the electronic filing fees. We propose to collect the interim filing fees for the electronic filingof passenger fares as specified above, until such time as we revise theelectronic filing fee schedule in light of actual experience under electronicfilings. We are specifically seeking public and industry comments on our proposedinterim electronic filing fees. For general, day-to-day, on-line access to electronically filed tariffdata, our proposed rule provides that the public would be provided suchaccess, free of charge, at DOT headquarters. With respect to the cost ofproviding certified copies or other services involving passenger faresfiled electronically, the Department proposes to follow the provisionsregarding Freedom of Information Act requests, at 49 CFR Part 7 (also see14 CFR Part 310). We would not assess a charge for copies made from theprinter or printers placed by the filer in the Public Reference Room. Thefiler may assess such fees, provided they are reasonable and that no administrativeburden is placed on the Department to require the collection of fees orprovide services. We welcome comments from the public and the industry on the issue of userfees. <ITAG tagnum="84">ABC's Competition Argument </ITAG>We do not share ABC's belief that ATPCO's large market share will havecompetitive ramifications on ABC or any other interested party. We havecarefully drafted our proposal to allow any carrier, or its agent, to filefare tariffs electronically under identical conditions. Moreover, theseconditions have been stated in general terms limited only by what we believeto be the Department's minimum needs. We do not wish to create limitationsthat could allow any party to attain an unfair advantage due to its particulardata processing equipment, telecommunications capabilities, etc. Therefore,it is not clear to us what advantage ATPCO would have in an automated environmentthat it does not already have by virtue of the fact that it currently filesprinted tariffs on behalf of the majority of carriers that file. Sayingthis, we appreciate that interested persons may wish to comment on thisissue and we invite them to do so. In response to ABC's concerns about a rule which could operate to ATPCO'scompetitive advantage, we would note first that ATPCO is not immune fromoperation of the antitrust laws. <T3>See </T3>DOT Order 87-5-44, May 18, 1987. As always, our monitoringof the implementation of this rule would be a continuing one. In additionto this Departmental oversight, filers coming in under our proposed rulewould, as ABC points out, remain subject to judicial scrutiny under theantitrust laws. <T3>See </T3>DOT Order 85-9-57, September 26, 1985, at 19. Further, ourproposal seeks to be competitively neutral, allowing equal opportunitiesto all carriers and agents regarding the electronic filing of their fares.We recognize also that, in a sense, we are opening a new market_that offiling, not paper tariffs, but electronic tariffs. By creating that option,it may be that other firms, specializing in ADP and related fields, mayfind it advantageous to enter the marketplace. Our proposal should allowthem a fair opportunity to do so. Thus, to the extent that this rule wouldhave any effect on the competitive environment, we would perceive sucheffect to be pro-competitive, not anti-competitive. <ITAG tagnum="84">ABC's Procurement Argument </ITAG>We do not accept ABC's assertions that ATPCO's proposal is an impropermanner for the Department of proceed in view of our on-going rulemakingin this Docket, or that we are required to procure ETS equipment and services.Under our proposal, the Department would not be acquiring equipment fromelectronic filers for its own purposes. Terminals and peripheral equipmenthave already been obtained at DOT for tariff processing purposes via competition.The terminal or terminals provided for public use would remain the propertyof the filers, and be of use only in connection with the review of datasupplied by that filer. We would require the filers to ensure the security,retention, and dissemination of the on-line tariff database. DepartmentalETS services (as involved, for example, in the downloading of daily submissionsor storage of official data at the Department) would largely be furnishedthrough an on-site contractor, selected via appropriate competition, thatsupplies computer services to various Departmental elements. Of course,once we progress to a fully integrated system, different considerationswill likely exsit and a need for formal procurement may arise.<ITAG tagnum="84">Alternatives </ITAG>Before choosing the approach set out in our proposed rule, the Departmentcarefully considered several other options which are available to us inthis area. In fact, most of these options have been explored in-depth inthe document, <T3>Automation of the OIA Tariff System, A Cost Benefit Analysis,</T3>dated March 1987. This document was prepared by the Department's TransportationComputer Center. Because this document is a part of this Docket, we willonly briefly discuss these options here. The first alternative was the possibility of streamlining the current papertariff filing system in 14 CFR Part 221. However, over the past severalyears the Department has streamlined its operations and eased the paperworkburden on the carriers in as many ways as possible within the confinesof the current paper system without undermining the very integrity of thatsystem. The second alternative we considered was storing images of tariff pageson an optical disk. An optical disk is a computer-oriented storage devicewhich has the capability of storing up to 2,000 printed pages per disk.Under this system, the Department would transfer printed tarriff pagesonto an optical disk. (For a more detailed discussion of an optical disksystem, see pages 5-13 through 5-20 of our study, <T3>Automation of the OIA Tariff System, A Cost Benefit Analysis,</T3>March 1987.) The optical disk alternative would provide some relief asfar as simply accessing tariff information. However, such a system wouldnot allow for the possibility of automating any of the Department's analyticalor clerical functions. Consequently, any real relief to the Departmentwould be negligible. Even more important, under this option no relief wouldaccrue to the industry, since it still would be required to publish tariffpages. A third alternative, tariff deregulation of international air transportation,would certainly eliminate the tariff burden for all concerned, just asit has for domestic air travel. However, such action would require a changein the Act as well as the possible renegotiation of many bilateral agreementsbetween the U.S. and other countries, neither of which we consider a possibilityat this time. Even if such changes were foreseeable, the time frame forimplementing them would be quite long, thereby not providing the near-termrelief needed by the Department and the industry. We also considered the use of an airline reservation system to satisfythe Department's tariff filing requirements. Under this alternative thecarriers would simply place their fares into an airline reservation systemand would notify the Department that they had done so. Tariffs would nolonger be filed with the Department. While this alternative would certainlyeliminate the tariff filing burden on all parties, it would effectivelymean the end of the Department's regulatory and statutory responsibilitiesover such tariffs. For the reasons cited above, we do not regard this asan acceptable alternative. Any alternative that involved implementing any other type of automatedtariff system, whether it be contractor-owned/contractor-operated, or DOTowned/operated, would require the Department to complete its system definition,develop specifications, and meet competitive procurement requirements_stepswhich would take time and which therefore would mean that such an alternativecould provide no near-term relief. Finally, since we already have an ANPRM outstanding on the very subjectof tariff computerization, we could simply defer any action on ATPCO'spetition until final action in this Docket. However, as we have alreadyindicated, complete definition, design and implementation of any ETS willinvolve compex issues, making it unlikely that this option could providethe interim relief which is central to ATPCO's petition and our proposedrule. We believe that the proposal set forth in this NPRM offers the best opportunityfor the Department and the industry to realize some measure of much-neededrelief from the the ever-growing burden of publishing and processing papertariffs. However, we seek comments on any other alternatives that wouldaccomplish this goal. <ITAG tagnum="84">Supplementary Discussion of Comments on the ANPRM </ITAG>We received several comments to our tariff automation ANPRM (50 FR 33452,August 19, 1985) indicating that the Department should rely on the privatesector for development and operation of any electronic tariff filing system.It was suggested that the Department should develop systems responsiveto its own needs and work with private industry to provide service to meetany other needs; the Department should have separate contracts for thoseaspects of the system which address the internal administration needs ofthe Department and those which address the receipt and dissemination oftariff information to the public. Several commenters offered their services,or products, for use in conjunction with development of the ETS. In the notice establishing its Advisory Committee (51 FR 42327, November24, 1986), the Department set out thirteen specific goals which we hopedto achieve in implementing an electronic tariff filing system. One of thosegoals was using private sector resources wherever feasible in developingour complete system. We have been mindful of that goal in formulating thepresent proposed rule. Central to our instant proposal is that the filingairlines or their agents would be establishing and maintaining their owntariff databases for the use by DOT and the public. Further, with respectto DOT's regulatory functions, we will use the resources of either ourTransportation Computer Center or Transportation Systems Center, both ofwhich use the services of on-site private industry contractors. Several commenters stated that any electronic tariff filing system shouldbe compatible with databases and systems in use in the industry; some commenterssuggested that the Department should use one or more industry databasesas the official tariff database, rather than create a separate databaseof its own. However, other commenters noted that some interests could possiblygain competitive advantage if the Department's electronic tariff systemis run on the computers of a selected carrier or tariff agent. One commentermade it clear that the Department should not create the possibility, oreven the appearance, of conflict of interest in connection with tariffautomation; that the Department should specifically and publicly make clearall criteria established to maintain propriety. Our proposal here wouldallow any carrier, or its agent, to establish and maintain an on-line tariffdatabase. The Department and the public would be permitted access to thistariff database for daily use. We believe this course of action will provideno competitive advantage for any party. Two commenters to the ANPRM suggested that the Department should consultwith other governments in order to establish uniform tariff proceduresand formats. In this connection, we note that two foreign governments siton our Advisory Committee as non-voting, ex-officio members. One commenter was concerned with how carriers would fulfill their responsibilitiesfor filing fares or rates with other governments if the Department changesfrom a paper tariff environment to an electronic tariff environment, especiallyin the event that a carrier is required to provide copies of its U.S. tariffto foreign governments. We emphasize that electronic tariff filing underour proposed rule would not be mandatory; any carrier who saw a need tocontinue filing tariffs on paper would be free to do so. Further, a carriercould make printed copies of any data it might file electronically. Many comments we received dealt with the level and type of public accesswhich would be provided in conjunction with any proposed ETS. Again, thecomments represented widely divergent viewpoints. Some commenters suggestedthat the Department provide on-line access to electronically-filed tariffdata only at Department headquarters. In fact, it was suggested that theDepartment could be considered to be in competition with the private sectorif remote access to tariff data were permitted. Other comments clearlyindicated that there was a need for the Department to provide on-line accessto its tariff database to anyone with the necessary computer equipment.It was even suggested that the Department should provide the data for carriersto run their fare/rate quote systems. Another aspect of public access wasaddressed by two commenters who requested that the Department require thecarriers, or their agents, to continue to provide printed copies of tariffsfor those entities which do not possess the computer facilities neededto access the electronic tariff data; another commenter stated that carriers,or their agents, should provide electronic access to STPAs/tariffs filedwith the Department. We propose to require public access at Departmental headquarters to anyelectronically filed tariff-STPA, coupled with a requirement that the carrier,or its agent, make the electronic tariff available to any person on a remoteaccess basis, for a subscription fee. This service may be provided withoutcharge or at a charge which may not exceed a reasonable estimate of theadded cost of providing this service. One issue on which there was near unanimous agreement was that the Departmentshould take steps to amend or eliminate its posting requirement. Theserequirements provide that each carrier must maintain copies of all tariffsat each of its airport and city offices. We will address this issue ina contemporary rulemaking. Comments were filed concerning the security of the tariff data (for example,who can access what data, and when). The consensus was that the securityof tariff data is very important. One commenter noted that the Departmentshould establish ways of certifying electronic tariff data as the officialrecords of the Department. We have included a number of provisions in ourproposal expressly designed to ensure adequate security and certifiabilityof our records. With respect to filing fees or user charges in connection with an automatedsystem, one commenter noted that the Department should not expect the publicto bear the entire expense of development and operation of such a system.Instead, funding for automated systems should come from a mix of filingfees, user charges, and general appropriations. ATPCO's petition raisedthe filing fee issue and we have addressed it in the body of our discussion.There were several comments that expressed the hope that an automated tarifffiling system would reduce the number of STPA's needed to be filed withthe Department, while speeding up the approval process on those still necessary.One commenter suggested that we could achieve this result by amending thestatutory filing periods. We believe that the efficiencies associated withthe ability of carriers to file tariffs electronically would result ina reduction of the many inadvertent errors caused by a paper system. Sucha reduction in errors should result in a decrease in the number of STPA'srequired to correct these errors. With respect to expediting the approvalprocess for STPA's, we note that one commenter suggested that the Departmentshould implement an ``automated approval'' mechanism_for example, thatSTPA's would be automatically approved if not acted upon within a specifiedperiod of time after filing. This type of proposal is clearly beyond thescope of the relief we are proposing and moreover, would raise significantquestions about consistency with our statuory and regulatory obligations.However, we note that, even under our manual tariff filing system, we striveto process an STPA within 48 hours. Further, to the extent that the Departmentis able to realize increased efficiencies from the proposed rule, we wouldcertainly expect such efficiencies to result in a more rapid response timeto the industry and the public. There were several comments concerning the operation of the electronictariff system. These included a request that the justifications suppliedby a carrier in support of a proposed tariff or STPA would be availableto the public; that the Department should provide notice to the carrieror agent of any action taken on a fare filing, along with the reason formthe rejection of any fare filing or denial of an STPA; that tariffs filedelectronically should be available to the public as soon as they are filedwith the Department; and that the Department should maintain a historyfile as discussed in the ANPRM. Our proposed rule addresses these concerns.With respect to the maintenance of historical data, the rule proposes thata carrier, or its agent, must maintain tariff data on_line for a periodof two years after it becomes inactive. After that time, the carrier, orits agent, would provide the Department with this inactive tariff dataon machine-readable tapes, or other mutually acceptable electronic medium.Public access to this data can be requested at Departmental headquarters.One suggestion which we have not adopted is that a DOT automated tariffsystem should provide carriers access to the Standard Foreign Fare Level(SFFL) and Standard Foreign Rate Level (SFRL) fare and rate bases. (These``benchmark'' fares and rates are one of the standards against which theDepartment analyzes proposed fares and rates.) This suggestion is beyondthe scope of our proposal, which is directed only toward automating thepassenger fare filings received from the industry, not the Department'sentire tariff system. We will, however, consider such a possibility aswe continue development of our automated tariff system. Similarly, sinceour proposed rule provides only for the electronic filing of passengerfares tariffs, we are not addressing at this time those comments regardingother tariff matters, such as cargo rates or the content and format ofrule provisions. We also note that several commenters proposed generaloutlines of how an automated tariff system could be structured. Again,we will consider all of these comments as the Department moves forwardwith the tariff automation process. A commenter suggested that the Department should perform a cost/benefitstudy on electronic tariff filing. In fact, we have conducted such a study,<T3>Automation of the OIA Tariff System, A Cost Benefit Analysis, </T3>March1987, a copy of which is included in Docket 43343. We have fully consideredthe cost/benefit implications of our proposed rule and have discussed themin our Regulatory Evaluation. A commenter suggested that the Department implement a ``pilot'' systembefore final implementation of an automated tariff system. In this connection,in order to provide a smooth transition from paper tariff filing to electronictariff filing, we propose to require carriers filing electronically tocontinue filing paper tariffs for a period of 90 days, or until such timeas we shall deem paper filing no longer to be necessary. A commenter noted that tariff automation will be a major undertaking, andthat the issues associated with system development should be carefullyconsidered; the commenter urged the Department to proceed very methodicallyin system development. A commenter stated that the Department should paycareful attention to determining not only its own needs, but also the needsof outside users. We agree that development of a fully automated tariffsystem such as envisioned in our ANPRM plainly demands thorough considerationand careful attention to methodology and the need of all users. Recognizingthis, however, we are also mindful that we have reached a point where sometype of relief, however limited, is absolutely essential if the Departmentand the industry are to continue to fulfill their tariff responsibilities.We have undertaken the proposed rulemaking to provide such relief whilewe continue our efforts at developing a fully automated, integrated tariffsystem. Finally, a commenter stated that the Department's conversion to an automatedtariff environment should not hamper a carrier's ability to compete inthe international aviation marketplace. Rather, it should facilitate acarrier's ability to compete. We point out, in this connection, that oneof our major goals in establishing an automated tariff system is to maketariff filing more efficient both for the industry and the Department.We believe that this proposal would in no way diminish a carrier's abilityto compete; in fact, we believe that it would enable carriers to competemore effectively.<ITAG tagnum="85">Executive Order 12291, Regulatory Flexibility Act, and Paperwork ReductionAct, Federalism Assessment</ITAG>The Department certifies that this rule, if adopted as proposed, is nota major rule as defined by Executive Order 12291. It is, however, considereda significant rule under the Department's policies and procedures becauseit involves important Departmental policies and is a matter of significantinterest to the aviation industry. We have prepared a Regulatory Evaluationwhich is summarized below. Copies of the evaluation have been placed inDocket 43343. (A copy may be obtained by contacting Thomas G. Moore, Chief,Tariffs Division, P-44, Department of Transportation, 400 7th Street SW.,Washington, DC 20590, Telephone: (202)366-2414.) Further, I certify thatthe proposed rule would not have significant economic impact on a substantialnumber of small entities within the meaning of the Regulatory FlexibilityAct, Pub. L. 96-354. Virtually all airlines that provide internationalair transportation are large corporations. This notice of proposed rulemakinghas been analyzed in accordance with the principles and criteria containedin Executive Order 12612, and it has been determined that the conceptsdiscussed therein do not have sufficient federalism implications to warrantthe preparation of a federalism assessment.With respect to the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980, Pub. L. 96-511, ourproposal would produce a small increase in the carriers' reporting burdenbecause of their need to make formal application to file electronically.This new information requirement has been submitted to the Office of Managementand Budget for approval.However, we believe that the net paperwork burden associated with the tarifffiling requirements should dramatically decrease. For example, in 1987,the international airlines filed with the Department 241,230 tariff pagesapplicable to international air transportation. Of this total, 219,503applied to passenger service, and 21,727 applied to cargo service. Of the241,230 tariff pages filed, we estimate that 65 percent involved passengerfares only. Assuming all carriers currently filing tariffs in paper formelect to file electronically, we would estimate an actual paperwork reductionof 142,676 pages filed with the Department, which would produce a reductionof approximately 60 percent in the paperwork burden.As we said above, carriers, or their agents, electing to file tariffs electronicallywill be subject to a new reporting requirement. Specifically, they willneed to make a one-time application under andSection; 221.260 for authorizationto file tariffs electronically. However, we expect these applications tobe straightforward and short, not exceeding a few pages. Given the thousandsof pages of paperwork to be saved by adoption of the electronic filingoption, we believe that, on balance, the paperwork involved in the initialapplication would be a minor burden.<ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Evaluation</ITAG>The Department received many comments to our ANPRM which indicated that,while electronic filing could be expected to reduce the costs of filingtariffs, the magnitude of any such changes were difficult to quantify absenta specific ETS proposal. This section summarizes the estimated economicimpact of our proposed rule. We welcome public and industry comments onthese findings.In our ANPRM, we set out the costs to the government (over $500,000 a year)and to the industry (at least $5 million a year) of filing and processingprinted tariffs, as well as the potential benefits which could accrue toboth if the tariff filing system was automated. Comments to that ANPRMconfirmed that automation would be beneficial. Our March 1987 <T3>Cost-Benefit Analysis</T3>, which detailed costs (in excess of $21million a year, with 78 percent of such costs being borne by the industry)and benefits that could accrue to both the Government and the industrywith automation, further concluded that it was clearly cost-effective toautomate the tariff filing function.In its petition, ATPCO stated that the ability to file fares tariffs electronicallywould reduce industry tariff costs by over $2.5 million per year, justfor printing costs. ATPCO went on to state that the industry would alsobenefit financially from the ability to implement new fare packages morequickly in an automated environment than under the paper filing system.The government would also benefit. Right now, our tariff workload has reacheda saturation point and we fully expect this workload to continue to increasesubstantially. Under these circumstances, we are finding it increasinglydifficult to fulfill our statutory and regulatory responsibilities.A principal feature of our proposed rule is that it would be permissive.That is, it would provide carriers wishing to file fares electronicallythe option of doing so. It would not, however, eliminate the current, paper-basedsystem. Carriers preferring to file as they have been doing could continueto do so. We believe the rule would reduce economic and paperwork burdenson the industry and on the government. But the key point is that the impactof this rule is within the discretion of the affected parties. To the extentthat there is impact, the impact promises to be positive.We believe that the proposal we have outlined would provide the Departmentand the industry with some much-needed paperwork relief, even while theDepartment continues its work on the ETS. We reached our conclusion afterconsidering several other options. These options were discussed earlierin this rulemaking, along with the reasons for their rejection.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>14 CFR Part 221Air fares and rates; Explosives; Freight; Handicapped; Contracts; Claims;Consumer protection; Travel.14 CFR Part 389 Archives and records. This proposed rule is being issued under the authority delegated to theAssistant Secretary for Policy and International Affairs contained in 49CFR 1.56(j)(2)(ii). For the reasons set forth in the preamble, the Departmentof Transportation proposes to amend 14 CFR Parts 221 and 389 as follows:<ITAG tagnum="52">PART 221_TARIFFS </ITAG>1. The Authority citation for Part 221 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 102, 204, 401, 402, 403, 404, 411, 416, 1001,1002, Pub. L. 85-726, as amended, 72 Stat. 740, 743, 754, 757, 758, 760,769, 771, 788; 49 U.S.C. 1302, 1324, 1371, 1372, 1373, 1374, 1381, 1481,1482.</ITAG>2. Subpart W would be added to the Table of Contents for Part 221 as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart W_Electronically Filed Tariffs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.251 Applicability of the subpart. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.260 Requirements for filing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.270 Time for filing and computation of time periods. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.275 Requirements for filing paper tariffs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.280 Content and explanation of abbreviations, reference marksand symbols. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.282 Statement of filing with foreign governments to be shown inair carrier's tariff filing. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.283 The filing of tariffs and amendments to tariffs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.284 Unique rule numbers required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.285 Adoption of provisions of one carrier by another carrier.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.286 Justification and explanation for certain fares. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.287 Statement of fares. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.300 Suspension of tariffs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.301 Cancellation of suspended matter. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.302 Special tariff permission. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.400 Discontinuation of electronic tariff system. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.500 Filing of paper tariffs required. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.600 Transmission of electronic tariffs to subscribers. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">221.700 Actions under assigned authority and petitions for reviewof staff action.</ITAG>3. Section 221.4 would be amended to add the following definitions in alphabeticalorder: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.4 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Area No. 1'' means all of the North and South American Continents andthe islands adjacent thereto; Greenland; Bermuda; the West Indies and theislands of the Caribbean Sea; and the Hawaiian Islands (including Midwayand Palmyra). ``Area No. 2'' means all of Europe (including that part of the Union ofthe Soviet Socialist Republics in Europe) and the islands adjacent thereto;Iceland; the Azores; all of Africa and the islands adjacent thereto; AscensionIsland; and that part of Asia lying west of and including Iran. ``Area No. 3'' means all of Asia and the islands adjacent thereto exceptthat portion incuded in Area No. 2; all of the East Indies, Australia,New Zealand, and the islands adjacent thereto; and the islands of the PacificOcean except those included in Area No. 1. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Bundled normal economy fare'' means the lowest one-way fare availablefor unrestricted, on-demand service in any city-pair market. ``CTR'' means a video display terminal that uses a cathode ray tube asthe image medium. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Direct-service market'' means an international market where the carrierprovides service either on a nonstop or single-flight-number basis, includingchange-of-gauge. ``ECAC agreement'' means the Memorandum of Understanding between the UnitedStates and various member nations of the European Civil Aviation Conference,signed on December 17, 1982, as revised and renewed on October 11, 1984,as further revised and renewed on February 13, 1987, and as may be subsequentlyfurther revised and renewed. ``Electronic tariff'' means an international passenger fares tariff ora special tariff permission application transmitted to the Department bymeans of an electronic medium, and containing fares for the transportationof persons and their baggage or property, and including such associateddata as arbitraries, footnotes, routings, and fare class explanations.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Field'' means a specific area of a record used for a particular categoryof data. ``Filer'' means an air carrier, foreign air carrier, or tariff publishingagent of such a carrier filing electronic tariffs on its behalf in conformitywith this subpart. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Official DOT tariff database'' means those data records constituted pursuantto andSection; 221.283 and 221.286 of this subpart, which are in the custodyof, and are maintained by, the Department of Transportation. ``On-line tariff database'' means the remotely accessible, on-line version,maintained by the filer, of (1) the electronically filed tariff data submittedto the official DOT tariff database, and (2) the Departmental approvals,disapprovals, and other actions, as well as any Departmental notation concerningsuch approvals, disapprovals, or other actions, that Subpart W of Part221 requires the filer to maintain in its database. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``SFFL'' means the Standard Foreign Fare Level as established by the Departmentof Transportation under section 1002 of the Federal Aviation Act of 1958,as amended (49 U.S.C. 1482). <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>``Unbundled normal economy fare'' means the lowest one-way fare availablefor on-demand service in any city-pair market which is restricted in someway, <T3>e.g.</T3> by limits set and/or charges imposed for enroute stopoversor transfers. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>4. Subpart W would be added to Part 221 as follows: <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart W_Electronically filed tariffs </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.251 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of the subpart. </ITAG>(a) Any carrier, consistent with the provisions of this subpart, and Part221 generally, may file its international passenger fares tariffs electronicallyin machine-readable form as an alternative to the filing of printed papertariffs as provided for elsewhere in Part 221. This subpart applies toall carriers and tariff publishing agents and may be used by either ifthe carrier or agent complies with the provisions of Subpart W. Any carrieror agent that files electronically under this subpart must transmit tothe Department the remainder of the tariff in a form consistent with Part221, Subparts A-V on the same day that the electronic tariff would be deemedreceived under andSection; 221.270(b). (b) To the extent that Subpart W is inconsistent with the remainder ofPart 221, Subpart W shall govern the filing of electronic tariffs. In allother respects, Part 221 remains in full force and effect. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.260 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for filing. </ITAG>(a) No carrier or filing agent shall file an electronic tariff unless,prior to filing, it has signed a maintenance agreement or agreements, furnishedby the Department of Transportation, for the maintenance and security ofthe on-line tariff database. (b) No carrier or agent shall file an electronic tariff, unless, priorto filing, it has submitted to the Department's Office of InternationalAviation, Tariffs Division, and received approval of, an application containingthe following commitments: (1) The filer shall file tariffs electronically only in such format asshall be agreed to by the filer and the Department. (The filer shall includewith its application a proposed format of tariff. The filer shall alsosubmit to the Department all information necessary for the Department todetermine that the proposed format will accommodate the data elements setforth in andSection; 221.283.) (2) The filer shall provide, maintain and install in the Public ReferenceRoom at the Department, (as may be required from time to time) one or moreCRT devices and printers connected to its on-line tariff database. Thefiler shall be responsible for the transportation, installation, and maintenanceof this equipment and shall agree to identify and hold harmless the Departmentand the U.S. Government from any claims or liabilities resulting from defectsin the equipment, its installation or maintenance. (3) The filer shall provide public access to its on-line tariff database,at Departmental headquarters, during normal business hours. (4) The filer shall provide the Department access to its on-line tariffdatabase 24 hours a day, 7 days a week. (5) The access required at Departmental headquarters by this subpart shallbe provided at no cost to the public or the Department. (6) The filer shall ensure that the Department shall have the sole abilityto approve or disapprove electronically any tariff filed with the Departmentand the ability to note, record and retain electronically the reasons forapproval or disapproval. The carrier or agent shall not make any changesin data or delete data after it has been transmitted electronically, regardlessof whether it is approved, disapproved, or withdrawn. The filer shall berequired to make data fields available to the Department in any recordwhich is part of the on-line tariff database. (7) The filer shall maintain all fares filed with the Department and allDepartmental approvals, disapprovals and other actions, as well as allDepartmental notations concerning such approvals, disapprovals or otheractions, in the on-line tariff database for a period of two (2) years afterthe fare becomes inactive. After this period of time, the carrier or agentshall provide the Department, free of charge, with a copy of the inactivedata on a machine-readable tape or other mutually acceptable electronicmedium. (8) The filer shall ensure that its on-line tariff database is secure againstdestruction or alteration (except as authorized by the Department), andagainst tampering. (9) Should the filer terminate its business or cease filing tariffs electronically,it shall provide to the Department on a machine-readable tape or any othermutually acceptable electronic medium, contemporaneously with the cessationof such business, a complete copy of its on-line tariff database. (10) The filer shall furnish to the Department, on a daily basis, on amachine-readable tape or any other mutually acceptable electronic medium,all transactions made to its on-line tariff database. (11) The filer shall afford any authorized Departmental official full,free, and uninhibited access to its facilities, databases, documentation,records, and application programs, including support functions, environmentalsecurity, and accounting data, for the purpose of ensuring continued effectivenessof safeguards against threats and hazards to the security or integrityof its electronic tariffs, as defined in this subpart. (12) The filer must provide a field in the Government Filing File for thesignature of the approving U.S. Government Official through the use ofa Personal Identification Number (PIN). (13) The filer shall provide a leased dedicated data conditioned circuitwith sufficient capacity (initially not less than 9.6K baud rate) to handleelectronic data transmissions to the Department. Further, the filer mustprovide for a secondary or a redundancy circuit in the event of the failureof the dedicated circuit. The secondary or redundancy circuit must be equalto or greater than 4.8K baud rate. The primary data circuit provided toaccess the on-line tariff database must be capable of being restored withinfour hours after failure. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.270 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Time for filing and computation of time periods. </ITAG>(a) A tariff, or revision thereto, or a special tariff permission applicationmay be electronically filed with the Department immediately upon compliancewith andSection; 221.260, and anytime thereafter, subject to andSection; 221.500.The actual date and time of filing shall be noted with each filing. (b) For the purpose of determining the date that a tariff, or revisionthereto, filed pursuant to this Subpart, shall be deemed received by theDepartment:(1) For all electronic tariffs, or revisions thereto, filed before 5:30p.m. local time in Washington, DC on Federal business days, such date shallbe the actual date of filing.(2) For all electronic tariffs, or revisions thereto, filed after 5:30p.m. local time in Washington, DC on Federal business days, and for allelectronic tariffs, or revisions thereto, filed on days that are not Federalbusiness days, such date shall be the next Federal business day.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.275</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirement for filing paper tariffs.</ITAG>(a) Any tariff, or revision thereto, filed in paper format which accompanies,governs, or otherwise affects, a tariff filed electronically, must be receivedby the Department on the same date that a tariff or revision thereto, isfiled electronically with the Department under andSection; 221.270(b). Further,such paper tariff, or revision thereto, shall be filed in accordance withthe requirements of Subparts A-V of Part 221. No tariff or revision thereto,filed electronically under this subpart, shall contain an effective datewhich is at variance with the effective date of the supporting paper tariff,except as authorized by the Department.(b) Any printed justifications, or other information accompanying a tariff,or revision thereto, filed electronically under this subpart, must be receivedby the Department on the same date as any tariff, or revision thereto,filed electronically.(c) If a filer submits a filing which fails to comply with paragraph (a),or if the filer fails to submit the information in conformity with paragraph(b), the filing will be subject to rejection, denial, or disapproval, asapplicable.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.280</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Content and explanation of abbreviations, reference marks and symbols.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Content. </T3>The format to be used for any electronic tariff mustbe that agreed to in advance as provided for in andSection; 221.260, andmust include those data elements set forth in andSection; 221.283. Thoseportions that are filed in paper form shall comply in all respects withPart 221, Subparts A-V.(b) <T3>Explanation of Abbreviations, Reference Marks and Symbols. </T3>Abbreviations,reference marks and symbols which are used in the tariff shall be explainedin each tariff.(1) The following symbols shall be used:<ITAG tagnum="15">R_Reduction.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">I_Increase.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">N_New Matter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">X_Canceled Matter.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">C_Change in Footnotes, Routings, Rules or Zones.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">E_Denotes change in Effective Date only.</ITAG>(2) Other symbols may be used only when an explanation is provided in eachtariff and such symbols are consistent throughout all the electronicallyfiled tariffs from that time forward.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.282</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statement of filing with foreign governments to be shown in air carrier'stariff filings.</ITAG>(a) Every electronic tariff filed by or on behalf of an air carrier thatcontains fares which, by international convention or agreement enteredinto between any other country and the United States, are required to befiled with that country, shall include the following statement:<ITAG tagnum="21">The rates, fares, charges, classifications, rules, regulations, practices,and services provided herein have been filed in each country in which filingis required by treaty, convention, or agreement entered into between thatcountry and the United States, in accordance with the provisions of theapplicable treaty, convention, or agreement.</ITAG>(b) The statement referenced in andSection; 221.282(a) may be included witheach filing advice by the inclusion of a symbol which is properly explained.(c) The required symbol may be omitted from an electronic tariff or portionthereof if the tariff publication that has been filed with any other countrypursuant to its tariff regulations bears a tariff filing designation ofthat country in addition to the C.A.B./D.O.T. number appearing on the tariff.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.283</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">The filing of tariffs and amendments to tariffs.</ITAG>All electronic tariffs and amendments filed under this subpart, includingthose for which authority is sought to effect changes on less than bilateral/statutorynotice under andSection; 221.302, shall contain the following data elements:(a) A <T3>Filing Advice Status File</T3>_which shall include:(1) Filing date and time;(2) Filing advice number;(3) Reference to carrier;(4) Reference to geographic area and to affected tariff number;(5) Effective date of amendment or tariff;(6) A place for government action to be recorded; and(7) Reference to the Special Tariff Permission when applicable.(b) A <T3>Government Filing File</T3>_which shall include:(1) Filing advice number;(2) Carrier reference;(3) Filing date and time;(4) Proposed effective date;(5) Justification text; reference to geographic area and affected tariffnumber;(6) Reference to the Special Tariff Permission when applicable;(7) Government control data, including places for:(i) Name of the government analyst, except that this data shall not bemade public, notwithstanding any other provision in this or any other subpart;(ii) Action taken;(iii) Remarks, except that this data shall not be made public, notwithstandingany other provision in this or any other subpart;(iv) Date action is taken; and(v) Personal Identification Number; and(8) Tariff, or proposed changes to the tariffs, including:(i) Market;(ii) Fare code;(iii) One-way/roundtrip (O/R);(iv) Fare Amount;(v) Currency;(vi) Footnote (FN);(vii) Rule Number;(viii) Routing (RG);(ix) Effective date and discontinue date; and(x) Percent of change from previous fares.(c) <T3>A Historical File</T3>_which shall include:(1) Market;(2) Fare code;(3) One-way/roundtrip (O/R);(4) Fare amount;(5) Currency;(6) Footnote (FN);(7) Rule Number;(8) Routing (RG);(9) Effective Date;(10) Discontinue Date;(11) Government Action;(12) Carrier;(13) All inactive fares (two years);(14) Any other fare data which is essential; and(15) Any necessary cross reference to the Government Filing File for researchor other purposes.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.284</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Unique Rule Numbers Required.</ITAG>The following tariff rule numbers shall be used in conjunction with normaleconomy fares filed pursuant to this Subpart.(a) The rule number for all ``bundled'' normal economy fares shall be 1000for fares between a point, or points, in the United States, its territoriesand possessions, on the one hand, and a point, or points, in Area 1 (excludingthe United States, its territories and/or possessions), on the other hand,and, for ``unbundled'' normal economy fares, shall be 1005.(b) Except as otherwise provided, the rule number for all ``bundled'' normaleconomy fares shall be 2000 for fares between a point, or points, in theUnited States, its territories and possessions, and a point, or points,in Area 2 via the Atlantic Ocean; and, for ``unbundled'' normal economyfares, shall be 2005. <T3>Exception: </T3>when transportation is provided via the Pacific Oceanthe rule numbers shall be, respectively, 3000 and 3005.(c) Except as otherwise provided, the rule number for all ``bundled'' normaleconomy fares shall be 3000 for fares between a point, or points in theUnited States, its territories and possessions, and a point, or points,in Area 3 via the Pacific Ocean; and, for ``unbundled'' normal economyfares, shall be 3005. <T3>Exception: </T3>when transportation is provided via the Atlantic Oceanthe rule numbers shall be, respectively, 2000 and 2005.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.285</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adoption of provisions of one carrier by another carrier.</ITAG>When one carrier adopts the tariffs of another carrier, the effective andprospective fares of the adopted carrier shall be changed to reflect thename of the adopting carrier and the effective date of the adoption. Further,the filed tariff shall bear a notation for each each of the fares thatwere adopted. Such notation shall reflect the name of the adopted carrierand the effective date of the adoption.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.286</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Justification and explanation for certain fares.</ITAG>Any carrier or its agent, must provide, as to any new or increased bundledor unbundled (whichever is lower) on-demand economy fare in a direct-servicemarket, a comparison between, on the one hand, that proposed fare, andon the other hand, the ceiling fare allowed in that market based on eitherthe pertinent ECAC Zone or SFFL. If, however, the carrier's proposed fareis intended to match that already approved for another direct-service carrier,the proponent carrier may forego the comparison and instead, simply identifythe direct competitor's fare it claims to match.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.287</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statement of fares.</ITAG>All fares filed electronically in direct-service markets shall be filedas single factor fares.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension of tariffs.</ITAG>(a) A rate, fare, charge, change, rule or other tariff provision that issuspended by the Department pursuant to section 1002 of the Act (49 U.S.C.1482) shall be noted by the Department in the Government Filing File andthe Historical File.(b) When the Department vacates a tariff suspension, in full or in part,and after notification of the carrier by the Department, such event shallbe noted by the carrier in the Government Filing File and the HistoricalFile.(c) When a tariff suspension is vacated or when it becomes effective upontermination of the suspension period, the carrier or its agent shall refilethe tariff showing the effective date.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.301</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cancellation of suspended matter.</ITAG>When, pursuant to an order of the Department, the cancellation of rules,fares, charges, or other tariff provision is required, such action shallbe made by the carrier by appropriate revisions to the tariff.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special tariff permission.</ITAG>(a) When a filer submits an electronic tariff or an amendment to an electronictariff for which authority is sought to effect changes on less than bilateral/statutorynotice, and no related tariff material is involved. The submission shallbear a sequential filing advice number. The submission shall appear inthe Government Filing File and the Filing Advice Status File, and shallbe referenced in such a manner to clearly indicate that such changes aresought to be made on less than bilateral/statutory notice.(b) When a filer submits an electronic tariff or an amendment to the electronictariff for which authority is sought to effect changes on less than bilateral/statutorynotice, and it contains related paper under andSection; 221.275, the submissionmust bear a sequential filing advice number and a sequential Special TariffPermission Application number as prescribed by Subpart P of 14 CFR Part221. The submission shall appear in the Government Filing File and theFiling Advice Status File, and shall be referenced in such a manner toclearly indicate that such changes are sought to be made on less than bilateral/statutorynotice.(c) Departmental action on the Special Tariff Permission request shallbe noted by the Department in the Government Filing File and the FilingAdvice Status File.(d) When a Special Tariff Permission has been approved by the Departmentunder this subpart, the filer must (1) use the permission in its entiretyas granted, unless the filer chooses not to submit the approved changes,(2) submit all approved changes concurrently, and (3) submit the approvedchanges on such notice as authorized by the Department.(e) Special Tariff Permissions which are not implemented within 15 daysafter approval by the Department shall be null and void.(f) All submissions under this section shall comply with the requirementsof andSection; 221.283.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.400</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Discontinuation of electronic tariff system.</ITAG>In the event that the electronic tariff system is discontinued, or thesource of the data is changed, or a filer discontinues its business, allelectronic data records prior to such date shall be provided immediatelyto the Department, free of charge, on a machine-readable tape or othermutually acceptable electronic medium.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Filing of paper tariffs required.</ITAG>After approval of any application filed under andSection; 221.260 of thispart to allow a filer to file tariffs electronically, the filer in additionto filing electronically must continue to file printed tariffs as requiredby Subparts A-V of Part 221 for a period of 90 days, or until such timeas the Department shall deem such filing no longer to be necessary.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.600</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transmission of electronic tariffs to subscribers.</ITAG>(a) Each filer that files an electronic tariff under this subpart shallmake available to any person so requesting, a subscription service meetingthe terms of paragraph (b) of this section.(b) Under the required subscription service, remote access shall be allowedto any subscriber to the on-line tariff database, including access to thejustification required by andSection; 221.286. The subscription service shallnot preclude the offering of additional services by the filer or its agent.(c) The filer at its option may establish a charge for providing the requiredsubscription service to subscribers: <T3>Provided, </T3>that the charge may not exceed a reasonable estimateof the added cost of providing the service.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 221.700</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Actions under assigned authority and petitions for review of staffaction.</ITAG>When an electronically filed record which has been submitted to the Departmentunder this subpart, is disapproved (rejected), or a special tariff permissionis approved or denied, under authority assigned by the Department of Transportation'sRegulations, 14 CFR 385.13, such actions shall be understood to includethe following provisions:(a) <T3>Applicable to a Record or Records Which is/are Diaspproved (rejected):</T3>The record(s) disapproved (rejected) is/are void, without force oreffect, and must not be used.(b) <T3>Applicable to a record or records which is/are disapproved (rejected),and to special tariff permissions which are approved or denied: </T3>Thisaction is taken under authority assigned by the Department of Transportationin its Organization Regulations, 14 CFR 385.13. Persons entitled to petitionfor review of this action pursuant to the Department's Regulations, 14CFR 385.50, may file such petitions within seven days after the date ofthe action. This action shall become effective immediately, and the filingof a petition for review shall not preclude its effectiveness.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 389_FEES AND CHARGES FOR SPECIAL SERVICES</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 389 would continue to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sections 204, 1002, Pub. L. 85-726, as amended, 72Stat. 743, 797; 49 U.S.C. 1324, 1502. Act of August 31, 1951, Ch. 376,65 Stat. 268; 31 U.S.C. 483a.</ITAG>2. Section 389.20 would be revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 389.20</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability of subpart.</ITAG>(a) This subpart applies to the filing of certain documents and recordsat the Department by nongovernment parties, and prescribes fees for theirprocessing.(b) For the purpose of this subpart, record means those electronic tariffrecords submitted to the Department under Subpart W of 14 CF Part 221,and contains that set of information which describes one (1) tariff fare,or that set of information which describes one (1) related element associatedwith such tariff fare.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 389.21</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>3. Section 389.21(a) introductory text would be amended by adding ``orrecord'' after the word ``document''.4. In andSection; 389.22, paragraph (a) would be redesignated as paragraph(a)(1) and a new paragraph (a)(2) would be added as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 389.22</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Failure to make proper payment.</ITAG>(a)(1) * * *(2) Except as provided in andSection; 389.23, records which are not accompaniedby the appropriate filing fees shall be retained and considered filed withthe Department. The Department will notify the filer concerning the nonpaymentor underpayment of the filing fees, and will also notify the filer thatthe records will not be processed until the fees are paid.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>5. The table in andSection; 389.25 would be designated as paragraph (a) anda heading added reading:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 389.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Schedule of processing fees.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Document-filing fees. * * *</T3>6. Section 385.25(b) would be added reading as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 385.25</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) <T3>Electronic Tariff Filing Fees. </T3>The filing fee for one (1) or moretransactions proposed in any existing record, or for any new or canceledrecord, shall be 5 cents per record.<ITAG tagnum="21">Issued in Washington, DC on July 1, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Matthew V. Scocozza,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary for Policy and International Affairs.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-15277 Filed 7-7-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4910-52-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>